Alaska statutes. Title 24. Legislature and Lobbying.
Article 2. Legislative Budget and Audit Committee.

Sec. 24.20.150.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.151.
Legislative Budget and Audit Committee established.

The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee is established as a permanent interim committee of the legislature. The establishment of the committee recognizes the need of the legislature for full-time technical assistance in accomplishing the fiscal analysis, budget review, and post-audit functions.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971)

Cross references. —

For related constitutional provisions, see Alaska Const., art. II, § 11.

Sec. 24.20.156.
Purposes.

The purposes of the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee include

monitoring and reporting

the performance of the agencies of the state that perform lending or investment functions;

the extent to which the performance of these agencies has contributed to the fiscal, financial, economic, and social improvement of the state and its citizens;

the extent to which these agencies and the executive have prepared and coordinated short-term and long-term economic, fiscal, investment, and financial planning;

holding these agencies accountable to statutory intent in their performance by recommending, where appropriate, changes in policy to the agencies or changes in legislation to the legislature;

annually reviewing the extent of capitalization of the investment funds of the state and alternative investment policy for the general fund surplus and recommending needed legislation.

History.

(§ 2 ch 18 SLA 1980)

Sec. 24.20.160.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.161.
Membership.

The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee is composed of 10 members: the chairmen of the senate and house finance committees; one member selected from each of the senate and house finance committees and appointed by the president of the senate and the speaker of the house, respectively; and three members appointed from each house by the respective presiding officer.
The chairman of the finance committee may choose not to serve on the committee.
If this occurs, the presiding officer of the appropriate house shall appoint a replacement from the finance committee.
The membership from each house shall include at least one member from each of the two major political parties.
The committee shall select its own chairman.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971)

Sec. 24.20.165.
Alternate members.

The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee shall have two alternate members in addition to the members designated in AS

24.20.161

.
The president of the senate shall appoint one alternate member from the senate finance committee and the speaker of the house shall appoint one alternate member from the house finance committee.
The alternate members shall serve on the committee when a meeting of the committee has been called and the chairman determines that there will not be enough members in attendance at the meeting to provide a quorum.
While serving as alternates, the alternate members have the same duties and responsibilities as committee members appointed under AS

24.20.161

, and they are entitled to the same travel and per diem allowances.

History.

(§ 1 ch 57 SLA 1979)

Sec. 24.20.170.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.171.
Organization of committee; term of membership.

The committee shall be organized within 10 days after the organization of each legislature. Members serve for the duration of the legislature during which they are appointed.

When a member of the committee files a declaration of candidacy for an elective office other than that of member of either house of the legislature, and the member has not resigned from membership on the committee, the member’s committee membership terminates on the date of filing.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 11 SLA 1975; am § 2 ch 146 SLA 1984; am § 7 ch 34 SLA 2007)

Sec. 24.20.180.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.181.
Vacancies.

When a vacancy occurs in the statutory or appointive membership of the committee, the presiding officer of the house incurring the vacancy shall choose a successor.
If the office of the president of the senate or speaker of the house of representatives becomes vacant and a vacancy from the affected house occurs among the membership of the committee, the remaining committee members from the house incurring the vacancy shall appoint a new member.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 11 SLA 1975)

Sec. 24.20.190.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.191.
Meetings.

The budget and audit committee may meet during sessions of the legislature and during the interim between sessions at such times and places in the state as the chairman may determine. Members may receive, for the minimum time required to get to and from meetings and for the period while attending meetings, the same travel and per diem allowances provided by law for members of the legislature when attending sessions, except that members of the committee receive no per diem during legislative sessions other than the per diem allowance paid to other members of the legislature.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971)

Sec. 24.20.200.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.201.
Powers.

The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee has the power to

organize, adopt rules for the conduct of its business, and prescribe procedures for the comprehensive fiscal analysis, budget review, and post-audit functions;

hold public hearings, administer oaths, issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses and production of papers, books, accounts, documents, and testimony, and have the deposition of witnesses taken in a manner prescribed by court rule or law for taking depositions in civil actions;

require all state officials and agencies of state government to give full cooperation to the committee or its staff in assembling and furnishing requested information;

review revenue projections, state agency appropriation requests, the expenditure of state funds, including the relationship between state agency program accomplishments and legislative intent, and the fiscal policies and procedures of state government;

review and approve proposed changes to agency authorized budgets as provided in AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act);

make recommendations concerning appropriations, their expenditure, and the fiscal policies and procedures of state government to the governor when appropriate, and to the legislature;

prepare and distribute reports, memoranda, or other necessary materials;

sue in the name of the legislature during the interim between sessions if authorized by majority vote of the full membership of the committee;

[Repealed, § 7 ch 67 SLA 2003.]

make recommendations to the legislature and to agencies of the state that perform lending or investment functions concerning the structure and operating practices of the agencies;

enter into and enforce all contracts necessary or desirable for the functions of the committee;

provide for annual post audits of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation, the Alaska Aerospace Corporation, and the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority.

Nothing in this chapter authorizes the referral by the presiding officer of legislation to the committee at regular or special sessions of the legislature.

The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee may delegate the powers authorized by (a)(2) of this section to the legislative fiscal analyst and the legislative auditor.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971; am § 1 ch 74 SLA 1977; am § 2 ch 57 SLA 1979; am § 3 ch 18 SLA 1980; am § 32 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 29 ch 142 SLA 1982; am § 3 ch 88 SLA 1991; am §§ 2, 7 ch 67 SLA 2003)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1987, “Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority” was substituted for “Alaska Industrial Development Authority” under § 43, ch. 42, SLA 1987.

In 2009, under § 2, ch. 60, SLA 2009, in this section “Alaska Aerospace Corporation” was substituted for “Alaska Aerospace Development Corporation”.

Sec. 24.20.206.
Duties.

The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee shall

annually review the long-range operating plans of all agencies of the state that perform lending or investment functions;

review periodic reports from all agencies of the state that perform lending or investment functions;

prepare a complete report of investment programs, plans, performance, and policies of all agencies of the state that perform lending or investment functions and notify the legislature on or before the first day of each regular session that the report is available;

in conjunction with the finance committee of each house, recommend annually to the legislature the investment policy for the general fund surplus and for the income from the permanent fund;

provide for an annual post audit and annual operational and performance evaluation of the Alaska Permanent Fund Corporation investments and investment programs;

provide for an annual operational and performance evaluation of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority; the performance evaluation must include, but is not limited to, a comparison of the effect on various sectors of the economy by public and private lending, the effect on resident and nonresident employment, the effect on real wages, and the effect on state and local operating and capital budgets of the programs of the Alaska Housing Finance Corporation and the Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority;

provide assistance to the trustees of the trust established in AS

37.14.400

—

37.14.450

in carrying out their duties under AS

37.14.415

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 18 SLA 1980; am § 33 ch 106 SLA 1980; am § 30 ch 142 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 1 FSSLA 1992; am § 35 ch 126 SLA 1994; am § 48 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 7 ch 67 SLA 2003; am § 8 ch 34 SLA 2007)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1987, “Alaska Industrial Development and Export Authority” was substituted for “Alaska Industrial Development Authority” under § 43, ch. 42, SLA 1987.

Sec. 24.20.209.
Records.

The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee shall keep a complete file of all reports presented to it and all reports presented by it to the legislature or to a legislative committee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 18 SLA 1980)

Sec. 24.20.210.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.211.
Legislative finance division.

The legislative finance division is established as a permanent staff agency responsible to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee for performance of fiscal analysis and budget review functions.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971)

Sec. 24.20.220.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.221.
Staff.

The committee shall hire and determine the salary of the legislative fiscal analyst who shall serve both at the direction and pleasure of the committee. The fiscal analyst shall serve as head of the finance division and, within the limits of the budget approved by the committee, shall employ and determine the compensation of the professional and clerical staff of the division.

The fiscal analyst and members of the professional and clerical staff may not join or support a partisan political organization. This prohibition does not prevent the fiscal analyst or members of the staff from joining social organizations, expressing private opinion, registering as to party, or voting.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971)

Sec. 24.20.230.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.231.
Duties.

The legislative finance division shall

analyze the budget and appropriation requests of each department, institution, bureau, board, commission, or other agency of state government;

analyze the revenue requirements of the state;

provide the finance committees of the legislature with comprehensive budget review and fiscal analysis services;

cooperate with the office of management and budget in establishing a comprehensive system for state budgeting and financial management as set out in AS 37.07 (Executive Budget Act);

complete studies and prepare reports, memoranda, or other materials as directed by the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee;

with the governor’s permission, designate the legislative fiscal analyst to serve ex officio on the governor’s budget review committee;

identify the actual reduction in state expenditures in the first fiscal year following a review under AS

44.66.040

resulting from that review and inform the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee of the amount of the reduction; and

not later than the first legislative day of each first regular session of each legislature, conduct a review in accordance with AS

24.20.235

of the report provided to the division under AS

43.05.095

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971; am § 7 ch 2 SLA 1982; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 1983; am § 1 ch 19 SLA 2013; am § 3 ch 61 SLA 2014)

Delayed repeal of paragraph (7). —

Under sec. 11, ch. 19, SLA 2013, paragraph (7) is repealed July 1, 2023.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (7), and made a related change; repealed (7), effective July 1, 2023.

The 2014 amendment, effective July 8, 2014, added (8) and made related changes.

Sec. 24.20.235.
Indirect expenditure report.

Every two years, the legislative finance division shall deliver to the chair of the finance committee in each house of the legislature a report analyzing the indirect expenditure report created under AS

43.05.095

for the appropriate agencies listed in this subsection. The first review shall occur in the calendar year set out after each agency’s name, as follows, and subsequent reviews of each agency shall occur every six years:

Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development, 2015;

Department of Fish and Game, 2015;

Department of Health and Social Services, 2015;

Department of Labor and Workforce Development, 2015;

Department of Revenue, 2015;

Alaska Court System, 2017;

Department of Administration, 2017;

Department of Education and Early Development, 2017;

Department of Environmental Conservation, 2017;

Department of Natural Resources, 2017;

Department of Transportation and Public Facilities, 2017;

all remaining agencies, 2019.

The report prepared under this section must provide

an estimate of the revenue foregone by the state because of the indirect expenditure;

an estimate of the monetary benefit of the indirect expenditure to the recipients of the benefit of the indirect expenditure;

a determination of whether the legislative intent of the indirect expenditure is being met and, if necessary, a determination of why the legislative intent of the indirect expenditure is not being met;

a recommendation as to whether each indirect expenditure should be continued, modified, or terminated, a basis for the recommendation, and the expected effect on the economy of the state if the recommendation is executed; and

an explanation of the methodology and assumptions used in preparing the report.

History.

(§ 4 ch 61 SLA 2014)

Effective dates. —

Section 38, ch. 61, SLA 2014 makes this section effective July 8, 2014.

Sec. 24.20.240.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.241.
Legislative audit division.

The legislative audit division is established as a permanent staff agency responsible to the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee for completion of the post-audit function.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971)

Sec. 24.20.250.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.251.
Qualifications and appointment of legislative auditor.

The legislative auditor shall be a certified public accountant of this state, or of another state having requirements equivalent to those of this state, with at least five years of practice in the profession, or the equivalent, before the appointment.

The Legislative Budget and Audit Committee shall examine persons to serve as legislative auditor and, upon completion of the examination, place the name of the person selected in nomination before the legislature. If the legislature is not in session, the person nominated shall carry out the duties of the office until the next session of the legislature at which time the name of the person nominated shall be presented to the legislature for appointment.

The legislative auditor serves at the pleasure of the legislature. However, when the legislature is not in session, the auditor may be removed for cause by a majority vote of the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee after notice by, and a hearing before, the committee.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971)

Sec. 24.20.260.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.261.
Staff.

The legislative auditor shall serve as head of the audit division and, within the limits of the budget approved by the committee, shall employ and determine the compensation of the professional and clerical staff of the division.

The auditor and members of the professional and clerical staff may not join or support any partisan political organization. This prohibition does not prevent the auditor or members of the staff from joining social organizations, expressing private opinion, registering as to party, or voting.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971)

Sec. 24.20.270.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.271.
Powers and duties.

The legislative audit division shall

conduct a performance post-audit of boards and commissions designated in AS

44.66.010

and make the audit, together with a written report, available to the legislature not later than the first day of the regular session of the legislature convening in each year set out with reference to boards and commissions whose activities are subject to termination as prescribed in AS 44.66; the division shall notify the legislature that the audit and report are available;

conduct a performance review of the agencies listed in AS

44.66.020(a)

and make the final review report available to the legislature not later than the first day of the regular session convening in the year after the year designated for each agency performance review in AS

44.66.020(a)

;

audit at least once every three years the books and accounts of all custodians of public funds and all disbursing officers of the state;

at the direction of the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee, conduct performance post-audits on any agency of state government;

cooperate with state agencies by offering advice and assistance as requested in establishing or improving the accounting systems used by state agencies;

require the assistance and cooperation of all state officials and other state employees in the inspection, examination, and audit of state agency books and accounts;

have access at all times to the books, accounts, reports, or other records, whether confidential or not, of every state agency;

ascertain, as necessary for audit verification, the amount of agency funds on deposit in any bank as shown on the books of the bank; no bank may be held liable for making information required under this paragraph available to the legislative audit division;

complete studies and prepare reports, memoranda, or other materials as directed by the Legislative Budget and Audit Committee;

have direct access to any information related to the management of the University of Alaska and have the same right of access as exists with respect to every other state agency;

conduct an audit every two years of information found in the annual reports required under AS

42.05.211

and AS

42.06.220

regarding compliance by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska with the requirements of AS

42.05.175(a)

— (e) and of the timeline extensions made by the commission under AS

42.05.175(f)

, and of other performance measures adopted by the commission;

[Repealed, § 7 ch. 35 SLA 2015.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971; am § 4 ch 46 SLA 1977; am § 4 ch 149 SLA 1977; am § 49 ch 21 SLA 1995; am § 1 ch 37 SLA 2007; am § 1 ch 51 SLA 2012; am § 2 ch 19 SLA 2013; am § 7 ch 35 SLA 2015)

Delayed repeal of paragraph (2). —

Under sec. 11, ch. 19, SLA 2013, paragraph (2) is repealed July 1, 2023.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in (1) deleted “and of those programs and activities of agencies subject to termination as determined in the manner set out in AS

44.66.020

and

44.66.030

” following “commissions designated in AS

44.66.010

”, deleted “or agency programs” following “commissions”; added (2); repealed (2), effective July 1, 2023; made related changes throughout the section.

The 2015 amendment, effective July 1, 2015, repealed (12).

Opinions of attorney general. —

Although AS

23.30.110(a)

and 43.20.190(a) (now repealed) guarantee confidentiality of records in the Department of Labor and Revenue, paragraph (6) (now paragraph (7)) of this section enables the Division of Audit to have access to the records of every state agency whether confidential or not. 1972 Op. Att’y Gen.

A legislative auditor may not examine confidential records on file for state income tax returns and wage information submitted by employees and employers to the Department of Labor in connection with the administration of the State Employment Security Act to determine if persons receiving assistance from the Department of Health and Social Services under their Adult Public Assistance and Aid to families with dependent children were eligible.
Such data is within the ambit of protection intended to be afforded the right of privacy under Alaska Const., art. I, § 22. 1972 Op. Att’y Gen.

Under paragraph (6) (now paragraph (7)), the Legislative Audit Division (division) has the authority to obtain otherwise confidential data from state agencies, and statutory safeguards under AS

24.20.301(a)

are in place to protect the confidentiality of that data once it has been transferred; and where the division has assured a commission subject to its request for such records that any confidential material obtained will be returned or destroyed, on balance, disclosure to the division would not impermissibly infringe the right of privacy under Alaska Const., art. I, § 22, and the commission may respond favorably to the request. Mar. 27, 1991 Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 24.20.280.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.281.
Special audit.

A member of the legislature may, in writing and with at least six days notice, request that the budget and audit committee direct a special audit of any state agency or determine the propriety of any expenditure of state funds received by any political subdivision or other entity obtaining state funds. Should a majority of the committee vote to approve the request, the legislative audit division shall make the audit.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971)

Sec. 24.20.290.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.291.
Conflict of interest.

The legislative auditor, the supervisor of audit, the legislative fiscal analyst, and members of the staff of the legislative finance and audit divisions may not serve in ex officio or other capacity on any board, except as authorized in AS

24.20.231

(6), commission or other administrative agency of state government; nor may they have a financial interest in transactions involving any agency of state government.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971)

Sec. 24.20.300.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.301.
Records.

The legislative audit division shall keep a complete file of all audit reports, performance review reports, and other reports or releases issued by the division, and a complete file of audit work papers, performance review work papers, and other related supportive material. The division shall also keep a complete and accurate record of all fiscal transactions involving the division. Audit records and performance review records are confidential, and audit reports and performance review reports are confidential unless the report has been approved for release under AS

24.20.311

.

The legislative finance division shall keep a complete file of all budget reports and other reports or releases issued by the division and a complete and accurate record of all fiscal transactions involving the division.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971; am § 3 ch 146 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 19 SLA 2013; am § 1 ch 5 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, in the third sentence of (a), inserted “and performance review reports” following “confidential and audit reports”.

The 2014 amendment, effective March 26, 2014, in (a), in the first sentence inserted “, performance review reports,” following “all audit reports” and “, performance review work papers,” following “audit work papers”, in the third sentence inserted “and performance review records” following ”Audit records”.

Sec. 24.20.310.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Sec. 24.20.311.
Reports.

The committee shall file copies of its approved audit reports including any committee recommendations with the governor, the agency concerned, and the legislature. An annual report summarizing the audit reports and committee recommendations made during the year shall be filed with the governor and with the legislature on or before the first day of each regular session of the legislature. Reports shall be approved by a majority of the committee before their release and shall be open to public inspection after their release to the legislature.

The annual report must include the actual and projected reductions in state expenditures resulting from reviews conducted under AS

44.66.040

.

History.

(§ 2 ch 95 SLA 1971; am § 9 ch 34 SLA 2007; am § 4 ch 19 SLA 2013)

Delayed repeal of subsection (b). —

Under sec. 11, ch. 19, SLA 2013, subsection (b) is repealed July 1, 2023.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2013, added (b), and made a related change; repealed (b), effective July 1, 2023.

Secs. 24.20.320 — 24.20.370.
[Repealed, § 1 ch 95 SLA 1971.]

Secs. 24.20.400 — 24.20.460.
Administrative Regulation Review Committee.

History.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 7 SLA 2018.]

Secs.
24.20.500 — 24.20.570.
Legislative board of retirement benefits. [Repealed, § 40 ch 146 SLA 1980.]

Secs. 24.20.600
— 24.20.630.
Citizens’ Oversight Council on Oil and Other Hazardous Substances. [Repealed, § 43
ch 128 SLA 1994.]